Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3509
Geologist, defined.

Geologist means a person who is qualified to practice geology by reason of special knowledge and use of the earth sciences and the principles of geology and geologic data collection and analysis acquired by geologic education and geologic experience.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 57;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 8.